grammar/big-grammar/big.ur.lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Masc +Fem d͡ʒ t͡ʃ

LEXICON Root

Adj ;

LEXICON AdjInf

+Masc:0   #;
+Fem:ə    #;

LEXICON Adj
ə-βə-ru-1ɣad AdjInf;
ə-βuɾ-ðə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-βɾu-zə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-βu-zə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-kə-su-1lad AdjInf;
ə-sə-1toz AdjInf;
ə-klə-1mi-ði AdjInf;
ə-ku-1ni-tik AdjInf;
ə-1kɾɔ-ʒin AdjInf;
ə-ku-mu-lə-1tib AdjInf;
ə-ðə-li-si-1ad AdjInf;
əd-ʒun-1tib AdjInf;
ət-ki-ɾi-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
əd-bəɾ-βi-ə-lid-zə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-e-ɾu-1lɔ-ʒik AdjInf;
ə-fəb-bli-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-flik-1tib AdjInf;
ə-fɾu-ði-1zi-ək AdjInf;
ə-ɣə-1ɾɛn AdjInf;
ə-ɣu-zə-1ɾad AdjInf;
ə-ɣɾə-zu-1lad AdjInf;
ə-ɣus-ti-ni-1an AdjInf;
ə-ʒus-tə-1ðis AdjInf;
ə-1lan AdjInf;
əl-kə-1lin AdjInf;
əl-fə-1βɛ-tik AdjInf;
əl-1ʒi-nik AdjInf;
ə-ʎi-βə-ɾə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
əl-tə-1ɾoz AdjInf;
ə-1lɛr-ʒən AdjInf;
ə-lu-1ti-pik AdjInf;
ə-mə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
əm-bi-1ðeks-tɾə AdjInf;
ə-mə-1ɾin-di AdjInf;
əm-1fɔ-ɾik AdjInf;
ə-mu-1ni-ək AdjInf;
əm-1pli-sim AdjInf;
ə-nə-ku-1ɾɛ-tik AdjInf;
ə-nəl-ku-1ɔ-lik AdjInf;
ə-nəp-1tik-tik AdjInf;
ən-1din AdjInf;
ə-nə-1mɔ-fil AdjInf;
aŋ-ɡlu-1in-di AdjInf;
ə-ni-i-lə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-1nork AdjInf;
an-ti-əl-kə-1lin AdjInf;
an-ti-kɾip-tu-1ɣa-mik AdjInf;
an-ti-əs-1tɛ-tik AdjInf;
an-tim-fək-si-1oz AdjInf;
ən-ti-1nɔ-mik AdjInf;
an-ti-rə-1ki-tik AdjInf;
an-ti-1tɛr-mik AdjInf;
ən-tɾu-pu-1sɛn-tɾik AdjInf;
ə-nu-lə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-1nɔ-məl AdjInf;
ə-pə-ðɾə-ɣə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-plə-nə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-pu-1fa-tik AdjInf;
ə-pu-tə-1ɔ-zik AdjInf;
ə-1pɾak-tik AdjInf;
ə-1kwi-fəɾ AdjInf;
əɾ-βu-ɾid-1zad AdjInf;
ə-ɾə-1ni-fəɾ AdjInf;
ər-ʒi-1li-fəɾ AdjInf;
ər-1mɛ-ni AdjInf;
ə-rə-βə-sə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-rə-plə-ɣə-1ðis AdjInf;
ər-tə-1nɛŋk AdjInf;
ar-ʃi-fu-nə-1ma-tik AdjInf;
ə-zim-tu-1ma-tik AdjInf;
əs-1pɾib AdjInf;
ə-sə-ɲə-lə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ə-su-lə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
əs-tu-si-1oz AdjInf;
ə-1tɛ AdjInf;
əl-1lɛ-tik AdjInf;
ə-tɾum-pə-1tad AdjInf;
əd-zu-1ɾad AdjInf;
əuw-1ʒi-tik AdjInf;
auw-tu-ku-pi-ə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
əuw-tu-1ma-tik AdjInf;
əuw-1tɔ-num AdjInf;
ə-βən-tə-1ʎad AdjInf;
ə-zə-u-1tɾɔ-pik AdjInf;
bək-1si-fəɾ AdjInf;
bə-1ʒan AdjInf;
bəl-tu-fi-1nɛz AdjInf;
baɾ-βə-1ros AdjInf;
bəɾ-βu-1lad AdjInf;
bə-rə-1pɾim AdjInf;
bə-1zi-fuɡ AdjInf;
bə-βə-1ɾɛz AdjInf;
bə-1laj AdjInf;
be-nə-βən-tu-1ɾoz AdjInf;
bem-pər-1lad AdjInf;
bər-li-1nɛz AdjInf;
bi-1kɔ-nik AdjInf;
bi-u-1ʒɛ-nik AdjInf;
bi-tə-1ma-tik AdjInf;
blə-1nad AdjInf;
bum-bəɾ-1ðeɾ AdjInf;
bu-rə-1ɣeɾ AdjInf;
bɾə-mə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
bɾu-1moz AdjInf;
bu-1oz AdjInf;
1bi-fid AdjInf;
kəl-1ka-ni AdjInf;
kəl-1moz AdjInf;
kəm-pə-1ɲɔl AdjInf;
kə-1nɔ-nik AdjInf;
kəp-tə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
kəɾ-βuk-1si-lik AdjInf;
kə-ɾu-1ti-ði AdjInf;
kəs-tə-ʎu-1neɾ AdjInf;
kə-1ta-ðɾum AdjInf;
sə-fə-lu-tu-1ɾa-sik AdjInf;
sən-1tɾi-pət AdjInf;
si-1klɔ-pi AdjInf;
sir-kum-bə-1in AdjInf;
klə-1ɾi-sim AdjInf;
klu-1tud AdjInf;
ku-ðu-1loz AdjInf;
kul-pə-ʒə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
kum-mi-zə-ɾə-1tib AdjInf;
kum-pɾən-1sib AdjInf;
kuŋ-kɾə-si-u-1nad AdjInf;
kum-fur-tə-1tib AdjInf;
kun-su-lə-1tib AdjInf;
kun-tɾək-1toɾ AdjInf;
ku-pi-ə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
kur-mu-1fi-tik AdjInf;
kur-tə-1zan AdjInf;
kɾe-ə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
kɾip-tu-1ɣɾa-fik AdjInf;
1kɾu AdjInf;
ku-li-1na-ɾi AdjInf;
1kars-tik AdjInf;
dəl-1tɔ-nid AdjInf;
də-klə-ɾə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
də-1ʒek-tə AdjInf;
də-mus-tɾə-1tib AdjInf;
də-pu-ɾə-1tib AdjInf;
dəz-βə-ɾə-tə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
də-zəm-fəj-1nad AdjInf;
dəz-ʎiuw-ɾə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
dəs-pɾə-βiŋ-1ɡud AdjInf;
də-1tɾi-tik AdjInf;
di-ə-1lɛk-tik AdjInf;
di-1ðak-tik AdjInf;
di-1mɔrf AdjInf;
dis-ku-ti-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
di-su-lu-1tib AdjInf;
dub-blə-ɣə-1ðis AdjInf;
du-1ni-βul AdjInf;
1du-plə AdjInf;
ə-ðə-1tan AdjInf;
ə-1ʃut AdjInf;
ə-lə-βə-1tɔ-ɾi AdjInf;
əm-bɾi-u-1lɔ-ʒik AdjInf;
əm-pə-ɲə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
əŋ-kəs-tə-ʎu-1nad AdjInf;
ən-du-1kɾin AdjInf;
əŋ-ɡə-1ɲi-βul AdjInf;
ən-rə-ɾi-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
ən-tu-1mɔ-ɣəm AdjInf;
ə-ɲu-ɾə-1ðis AdjInf;
ə-pis-ku-pə-li-1an AdjInf;
ər-mi-ni-1ad AdjInf;
əs-kə-1kad AdjInf;
əs-kə-tu-1lɔ-ʒik AdjInf;
əs-ku-1tɔ-pik AdjInf;
əz-1lab AdjInf;
əs-pəz-1mɔ-ðik AdjInf;
əs-1plɛn-did AdjInf;
əs-kis-1toz AdjInf;
əs-tə-ɾə-u-1fɔ-nik AdjInf;
əs-tɾə-fu-1la-ɾi AdjInf;
əs-1tu-pid AdjInf;
əuw-ɾə-zi-1a-tik AdjInf;
əks-klə-mə-1tib AdjInf;
əɡ-zu-ən-du-1kɾin AdjInf;
əks-pul-1soɾ AdjInf;
əks-1ta-tik AdjInf;
fə-1moz AdjInf;
fəs-ti-ʒi-1ad AdjInf;
fə-mə-1nin AdjInf;
fə-1roz AdjInf;
fi-lə-ɣər-1soz AdjInf;
fis-kə-lid-zə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
flət-1ʃeɾ AdjInf;
fu-li-u-1lad AdjInf;
fur-1moz AdjInf;
fɾə-ɣu-1ɾoz AdjInf;
fɾi-kə-1tib AdjInf;
fu-1ɣad AdjInf;
fur-1ti-βul AdjInf;
ɡə-1lan AdjInf;
ɡəŋ-ɡɾə-1noz AdjInf;
1ɡat AdjInf;
ʒə-ni-1ud AdjInf;
ʒər-mə-1ni-βul AdjInf;
ʒi-ɾu-1nin AdjInf;
ɡlu-ti-1noz AdjInf;
ɡu-1ɛ-tik AdjInf;
1ɡɾas AdjInf;
ɡɾu-ən-lən-1dɛz AdjInf;
1ɡɛr-ʃu AdjInf;
ə-mil-tu-ni-1an AdjInf;
ə-mi-pə-1la-ʒik AdjInf;
ə-ɾu-i-1nɔ-mən AdjInf;
ə-tə-1ɾɔ-luɡ AdjInf;
i-ðɾus-1ta-tik AdjInf;
ib-nə-1ɣɔ-ʒik AdjInf;
ir-1sut AdjInf;
u-mə-1ni-βul AdjInf;
u-ɾus-1kɔ-pik AdjInf;
i-ku-nu-1klas-tik AdjInf;
iɡ-1ni-βum AdjInf;
im-bə-1tud AdjInf;
im-mu-tə-1tib AdjInf;
im-pur-1tun AdjInf;
i-nəl-tə-1ɾad AdjInf;
iŋ-kuŋ-1kluz AdjInf;
iŋ-1kɔɡ-nit AdjInf;
in-1dɔk-tə AdjInf;
i-nəks-pə-ɾi-mən-1tad AdjInf;
im-fɾəp-1si-kik AdjInf;
in-ʒu-ɾi-ə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
in-sə-tis-1fet AdjInf;
in-su-pə-1ɾad AdjInf;
in-tər-mə-ði-1a-ɾi AdjInf;
in-1tɾors AdjInf;
ju-ði-1mɛ-tɾik AdjInf;
i-zu-1klin AdjInf;
iz-rə-e-1li-tik AdjInf;
ʒə-1kɛz AdjInf;
ʒu-ði-si-1oz AdjInf;
lə-sə-1tan AdjInf;
ləɾ-1βad AdjInf;
lə-1pɾoz AdjInf;
li-mi-tə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
li-1ɔ-fub AdjInf;
ʎəd-zə-1ɾoz AdjInf;
ʎən-ti-1ʎoz AdjInf;
ʎi-βə-1ɲoz AdjInf;
1ʎuɲ AdjInf;
lu-1ʒis-tik AdjInf;
1lim-pid AdjInf;
1maɡ AdjInf;
ma-lə-1βa-ɾik AdjInf;
mal-ku-1ɾoz AdjInf;
mal-məs-klə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
1maŋk AdjInf;
mən-ʃu-ɾi-1an AdjInf;
mər-ti-ni-1kɛz AdjInf;
mə-1sɔ-nik AdjInf;
mə-lu-ðɾə-1ma-tik AdjInf;
mər-kə-tu-ɾi-1an AdjInf;
mə-zu-zə-1pɾɔ-βi AdjInf;
mə-təm-1pi-ɾik AdjInf;
mi-kɾu-1li-tik AdjInf;
mi-nu-si-1oz AdjInf;
mid-1ʒeɾ AdjInf;
mu-lə-1ðis AdjInf;
mo-nu-1sɛ-fəl AdjInf;
mom-pə-ʎə-1ɾin AdjInf;
mur-1fɛ-mik AdjInf;
mu-βə-1ðis AdjInf;
mun-tə-1ɲɛz AdjInf;
ma-1ʎaɾɡ AdjInf;
1nan AdjInf;
nə-1kɾɔ-tik AdjInf;
ne-u-ə-1lɛ-nik AdjInf;
nɛuw-ɾu-mu-1toɾ AdjInf;
ni-1tɾi-fəɾ AdjInf;
nu-βət-1ʃeɾ AdjInf;
1ni-tɾik AdjInf;
ups-1tɛ-tɾik AdjInf;
u-ku-pə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
u-li-ɣu-lə-1si-tik AdjInf;
u-nə-1ɾoz AdjInf;
u-pu-1lent AdjInf;
uɾ-1ɣa-nik AdjInf;
u-si-lə-1tɔ-ɾi AdjInf;
u-1βi-fəɾ AdjInf;
pə-le-u-1li-tik AdjInf;
pə-1lu-ðik AdjInf;
pə-pu-1loz AdjInf;
pə-ɾə-mi-u-1lɔ-ʒik AdjInf;
pər-ti-1tib AdjInf;
pət-1ʃɛt AdjInf;
pə-ɣə-1ʎoz AdjInf;
pən-sə-1ɾoz AdjInf;
pər-fu-mə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
pər-1pɛ-tu AdjInf;
pə-ti-1tɔ-ɾi AdjInf;
pi-ɣəɾ-1ðoz AdjInf;
pi-u-1neɾ AdjInf;
pi-tə-1ɣɔ-ɾik AdjInf;
plə-ti-1ni-fəɾ AdjInf;
plu-ʒi-1seɾ AdjInf;
pu-li-1an-dɾə AdjInf;
pɔ-li-1pɾɔ-tik AdjInf;
pu-1li-tik AdjInf;
pur-tu-1a-ɾi AdjInf;
pɾəɡ-1ma-tik AdjInf;
pɾəm-sə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
pɾə-1tɛ-ɾit AdjInf;
pɾu-1kli-tik AdjInf;
pɾu-mə-tə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
pɾus-kɾip-1toɾ AdjInf;
pɾu-βu-kə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
psi-ku-1pa-tik AdjInf;
pun-1ʃud AdjInf;
1pɛr-sik AdjInf;
kwər-1si-fəɾ AdjInf;
kiŋ-kwə-ʒə-1na-ɾi AdjInf;
ra-ði-u-1fɔ-nik AdjInf;
rə-1ki-tik AdjInf;
rə-βu-βi-nə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
rə-kɾe-ə-1tib AdjInf;
rə-flək-1toɾ AdjInf;
rə-ɣwəɾ-ðu-nə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
rə-mi-1sib AdjInf;
rə-pə-ɾə-1tib AdjInf;
rə-pɾu-pi-1oz AdjInf;
rəs-təb-bli-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
rəuw-1zɛŋk AdjInf;
ri-ɣu-1ɾoz AdjInf;
ru-mən-1seɾ AdjInf;
ru-1ta-si AdjInf;
1rɛ-pɾu-βə AdjInf;
sə-kɾi-fi-kə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
səl-mu-1nad AdjInf;
1sant AdjInf;
sə-tur-ni-1an AdjInf;
sə-ðən-1ta-ɾi AdjInf;
sə-mən-1ti-si AdjInf;
sən-1sɔ-ɾi AdjInf;
sə-1ɾa-fik AdjInf;
siɡ-nə-1ta-ɾi AdjInf;
sim-1pɛ-təl AdjInf;
sin-1tɛ-pəl AdjInf;
su-1βɾeɾ AdjInf;
sul-su-1nin AdjInf;
su-1peɾ AdjInf;
su-pə-1ɣud AdjInf;
sup-sə-ə-ɾi-1an AdjInf;
su-ðə-1nɛz AdjInf;
su-pəɾ-βi-1oz AdjInf;
su-1ɾeɾ AdjInf;
1su-pəɾ AdjInf;
tə-ki-1ʎeɾ AdjInf;
tək-sə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
tə-mu-1ɾɛɡ AdjInf;
tə-u-1ɣɔ-nik AdjInf;
tɛr-mu-rə-ɣu-lə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
təs-tu-ði-1nad AdjInf;
tim-pə-1ni-tik AdjInf;
tu-lu-1zan AdjInf;
tu-ɾu-1loz AdjInf;
tɾəm-1poz AdjInf;
tɾə-1pɛŋk AdjInf;
tɾi-ə-1ðɛlf AdjInf;
tɾi-ʎə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
tɾu-βə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
tu-βu-1lad AdjInf;
1ta-lik AdjInf;
u-ðu-lə-1ðoɾ AdjInf;
u-1lɔ-tɾik AdjInf;
u-1ni-βuk AdjInf;
bək-1sin AdjInf;
bə-1lɛ-ɾik AdjInf;
bə-1ʎoz AdjInf;
bəɾ-ðu-1zɛŋk AdjInf;
bə-zi-ku-1loz AdjInf;
bi-lə-fɾəŋ-1kin AdjInf;
bis-1koz AdjInf;
bu-lən-1deɾ AdjInf;
1bɔ-mik AdjInf;
ʃə-1ɾɛk AdjInf;
zə-1βɾad AdjInf;
1ap-təɾ AdjInf;
1um-bɾik AdjInf;
